Utah statutes.
72-4-131.   State highways -- SR-252 and SR-256 to SR-260.

State highways include:

(1)  SR-252. From SR-91 and SR-89 northerly on 1000 West in Logan to 2500 North; then easterly on 2500 North Street to SR-91 in North Logan.

(2)  SR-256.  From Route 89 north of Salina northerly through Redmond to Route 89 south of Axtell.

(3)  SR-257.  From Route 21 at Milford northeasterly through Black Rock and Deseret to Route 6 near Hinckley.

(4)  SR-258.  From Route 70 near Elsinore easterly to Route 118 east of Elsinore.

(5)  SR-259.  From Route 24 near Sigurd, north to I-70 at the Sigurd Interchange.

(6)  SR-260.  From Route 24 south of Aurora to Route 50 west of Salina.



Amended by Chapter 57, 2008 General Session

